Illinois, session 104th, HB1173.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 225 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/225)7    Sec. 225. Credit for instructional materials and supplies. 8For taxable years beginning on and after January 1, 2017, a 9taxpayer shall be allowed a credit in the amount paid by the 10taxpayer during the taxable year for instructional materials 11and supplies with respect to classroom based instruction in a 12qualified school, or the maximum credit amount, whichever is 13less, provided that the taxpayer is a teacher, instructor, 14counselor, principal, or aide in a qualified school for at 15least 900 hours during a school year.16    The credit may not be carried back and may not reduce the 17taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of the 18credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess may 19be carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the 5 20taxable years following the excess credit year. The tax credit 21shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is a tax 22liability. If there are credits for more than one year that are 23available to offset a liability, the earlier credit shall be   HB1173- 2 -LRB104 04972 HLH 14999 b1applied first. 2    For purposes of this Section, the term "materials and 3supplies" means amounts paid for instructional materials or 4supplies that are designated for classroom use in any 5qualified school. For purposes of this Section, the term 6"qualified school" means a public school or non-public school 7located in Illinois. 8    For purposes of this Section, the term "maximum credit 9amount" means (i) $250 for taxable years beginning prior to 10January 1, 2023, and (ii) $500 for taxable years beginning on 11or after January 1, 2023 and beginning before January 1, 2025, 12and (iii) $1,000 for taxable years beginning on or after 13January 1, 2025. 14    This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 250.15(Source: P.A. 102-700, eff. 4-19-22.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.